Washington statutes.
RCW 35.31.040

Noncharter cities and towns—Manner of filing—Report.

All claims for damages against noncharter cities and towns shall be filed in the manner set forth in chapter 4.96 RCW.

No ordinance or resolution shall be passed allowing such claim or any part thereof, or appropriating any money or other property to pay or satisfy the same or any part thereof, until the claim has first been referred to the proper department or committee, nor until such department or committee has made its report to the council thereon pursuant to such reference.

[ 1993 c 449 s 8; 1989 c 74 s 1; 1967 c 164 s 13; 1965 c 7 s 35.31.040. Prior: 1957 c 224 s 4; 1915 c 148 s 2; 1909 c 167 s 1; RRS s 9481.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Purpose—Severability—1967 c 164: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Actions against political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi municipal corporations: Chapter 4.96 RCW.

Limitation of actions: Chapter 4.16 RCW.